Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 3. Licensing

§ 40-14-634.
License required; application; fee; conditions and execution; license nontransferable; display; renewal.

The administrator shall receive and act on all applications for licenses required under this act. Applications shall be filed in the manner prescribed by the administrator and shall contain the information the administrator requires by rule to make an evaluation of the financial responsibility, character and business qualifications of the applicant.

The administrator shall issue a license unless, upon investigation, he finds that the financial responsibility, character and business qualifications of the applicant, and of the members thereof, if the applicant is a partnership or association, and of the officers and directors thereof if the applicant is a corporation, are such as to warrant belief that the business will not be operated honestly and fairly within the purposes of this act.

The application for one (1) or more licenses shall be accompanied by a processing fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each license applied for, as set by rule of the administrator. If the expenses of the investigation and evaluation exceed the amount of the fee, the applicant shall reimburse the administrator the excess amount. If the expenses of the investigation and evaluation are less than the amount of the fee or if the application is withdrawn prior to the completion of the investigation and evaluation, the unexpended amount shall remain in the consumer credit administration account to be expended in accordance with W.S.

40-14-633

.

An applicant shall be notified when the application is approved. Within twenty (20) days after notification, the applicant shall pay an initial license fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00), as set by rule of the administrator.

Each office or place of business shall be licensed separately.

The license shall be prominently displayed at the place of business named in the license. The license shall not be transferable or assignable.

If a licensee wishes to move his office to another location, the licensee shall:

Give at least thirty (30) days written notice to the administrator; and

Pay a license modification fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00), as set by rule of the administrator.

Each license issued under this act shall expire on December 31. The license shall be renewed annually not less than thirty (30) days before the stated expiration date. The renewal fee for each license shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00), as set by rule of the administrator.

Upon written request, the applicant is entitled to a hearing on the question of his qualifications for a license if:

The administrator has notified the applicant in writing that his application has been denied; or

The administrator has not issued a license within sixty (60) days after the application for the license was filed. A request for a hearing may not be made more than fifteen (15) days after the administrator has mailed a writing to the applicant notifying him that the application has been denied and stating in substance the administrator’s findings supporting denial of the application.

The administrator may establish different fees authorized under this section for each category of licensee. The administrator shall establish fees in accordance with the following:

Fees shall be established by rule or regulation promulgated in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Fees shall be established in an amount to ensure that, to the extent practicable, the total revenue generated from the fees collected approximates, but does not exceed, the direct and indirect costs of administering the regulatory provisions required under this act;

The administrator shall maintain records sufficient to support the fees charged.

A license shall not be issued under subsection (b) of this section if the applicant has been convicted of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in a domestic, foreign or military court during the seven (7) year period preceding the date of the application for licensing, or at any time preceding such date of application if such felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, breach of trust or money laundering.

A license may be issued at the discretion of the administrator under subsection (b) of this section if the applicant has been convicted of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to a misdemeanor in a domestic, foreign or military court involving an act of fraud, dishonesty, breach of trust or money laundering.

In order to fulfill the purposes of this act, the administrator may establish relationships or contract with the registry or any other entity designated by the registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this act.

In addition to the other requirements of this section, in connection with an application for licensing, the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish to the administrator or the registry information concerning the identity of the applicant, the owners or persons in charge of the applicant and individuals designated in charge of the applicant’s places of business, including:

Fingerprints for submission to the federal bureau of investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive such information for a state, national and international criminal history background check; and

Personal history and experience, including the submission of authorization for the registry or the administrator to obtain:

An independent credit report obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in section 603(p) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act; and

Information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the federal bureau of investigation may have to maintain for purposes of paragraph (p)(i) of this section and subparagraph (p)(ii)(B) of this section, the administrator may use the registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the department of justice or any governmental agency.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the administrator may have to maintain for purposes of paragraph (p)(ii) of this section, the administrator may use the registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source as directed by the administrator.

Any fee charged and collected under this section shall be in accordance with W.S. 13-1-603(d) through (f).

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2; 2013 ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (m) and (n).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “December 31” for “July 1” in the first sentence in (h); and added (o) through (r).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (s).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (

l

) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 4, provides: “The administrator may commence rulemaking authorized under this act and take applications for and act upon licenses required under this act immediately upon passage of this section into law.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2013, ch. 27, § 3, directs:
“This act shall apply to new licenses issued
by the division of banking
under the Uniform Consumer Credit Code
and the Money Transmitter Act
on or after July 1, 2013. The provisions
of law existing prior to
amendment by this act shall apply to renewal
of licenses issued by
the division of banking under the Uniform Consumer
Credit Code and
the Money Transmitter Act prior to July 1, 2013.”

§ 40-14-635.
Revocation or suspension of license.

The administrator may issue to a person licensed under this act an order to show cause why his license should not be revoked or suspended for a period not in excess of six (6) months. The order shall state the place for a hearing and set a time for the hearing that is no less than ten (10) days from the date of the order. After the hearing the administrator shall revoke or suspend the license if he finds that:

The licensee has repeatedly and willfully violated this act or any rule or order lawfully made pursuant to this act; or

Facts or conditions exist which would clearly have justified the administrator in refusing to grant a license had these facts or conditions been known to exist at the time the application for the license was made.

No revocation or suspension of a license is lawful unless prior to institution of proceedings by the administrator notice is given to the licensee of the facts or conduct which warrant the intended action, and the licensee is given an opportunity to show compliance with all lawful requirements for retention of the license.

If the administrator finds that probable cause for revocation of a license exists and that enforcement of this act requires immediate suspension of a license pending investigation, he may, after a hearing upon five (5) days written notice, enter an order suspending the license for not more than thirty (30) days.

Whenever the administrator revokes or suspends a license, he shall enter an order to that effect and forthwith notify the licensee of the revocation or suspension. Within five (5) days after the entry of the order he shall deliver to the licensee a copy of the order and the findings supporting the order.

Any person holding a license under this act may relinquish the license by notifying the administrator in writing of its relinquishment, but this relinquishment shall not affect his liability for acts previously committed.

No revocation, suspension or relinquishment of a license shall impair or affect the obligation of any preexisting lawful contract between the licensee and any consumer.

The administrator may reinstate a license, terminate a suspension or grant a new license to a person whose license has been revoked or suspended if no fact or condition then exists which clearly would have justified the administrator in refusing to grant a license.

For purposes of this section, “licensee” shall also mean a licensed mortgage loan originator pursuant to W.S.

40-14-641

.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (h).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 4, provides: “The administrator may commence rulemaking authorized under this act and take applications for and act upon licenses required under this act immediately upon passage of this section into law.”

§ 40-14-636.
Records; confidentiality.

For purposes of this section, “licensee” shall also mean a licensed mortgage loan originator pursuant to W.S.

40-14-640

and an organization employing or contracting with a mortgage loan originator.

Every licensee shall maintain records in a manner that will enable the administrator to determine whether the licensee is complying with the provisions of this act. The administrator may by rule, and in accordance with W.S. 40-14-606(c), specify the manner in which records are to be made available. The records need not be kept in the place of business of the licensee, if the administrator is given free access to the records wherever located. The records pertaining to any transaction governed by this act need not be preserved for more than two (2) years after making the final entry relating to the transaction. In the case of a revolving loan account the two (2) years is measured from the date of each entry.

Except as provided in subsections (d), (e) and (j) of this section, all information or reports obtained by the administrator from an applicant or licensee are confidential.

Except as provided in P.L. 110-289, section 1512, the requirements under any federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to the registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to such information or material, shall continue to apply to such information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to the registry. Such information and any other confidential material obtained by the administrator may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with mortgage industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal or state law.

The administrator may enter into cooperative, coordinating or information sharing agreements with any other supervisory agency or any organization affiliated with or representing one (1) or more supervisory agencies with respect to the periodic examination or other supervision of any office in Wyoming of an out-of-state licensee, and the administrator may accept the parties’ reports of examination and reports of investigation in lieu of conducting his own examinations or investigations.

Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality protection under subsection (d) of this section shall not be subject to:

Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or agency of the federal government or the respective state; or

Subpoena, discovery or admission into evidence, in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with respect to any privilege held by the registry with respect to such information or material, the person to whom such information or material pertains waives that privilege, in whole or in part.

Any Wyoming law relating to the disclosure of confidential supervisory information or any information or material described in subsection (d) of this section that is inconsistent with subsection (d) of this section shall be superceded by the requirements of this section.

This section shall not apply with respect to the information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against, mortgage loan originator that is included in the registry for access by the public.

The administrator may enter into contracts with any supervisory agency having concurrent jurisdiction over a Wyoming licensee pursuant to this act to engage the services of the agency’s examiners at a reasonable rate of compensation. Any contract under this subsection shall not be subject to the provisions of W.S. 9-2-3204(b).

This section does not prohibit the administrator from disclosing to the public a list of persons licensed under this act.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a); designated the existing language as (b); and added (c) through (k).

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3204(b)" for "9-2-1016(b)" in the second sentence of (j).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-14-637.
Surety bonds.

Any organization employing or contracting with a mortgage loan originator shall maintain a surety bond to the state of Wyoming in accordance with this section. The surety bond shall be used to cover individual mortgage loan originators employed by or under contract with the organization. The amount of the bond shall be established by rule of the administrator based upon the volume of residential mortgage loan activity transacted by the organization under this act.

The surety bond shall be a continuing obligation of the issuing surety. The surety’s liability under the bond for any claims made under the bond either individually or in the aggregate shall in no event exceed the face amount of the bond issued. The bond shall be issued by a surety authorized to do business in the state of Wyoming. The bond, including any and all riders and endorsements executed subsequent to the effective date of the bond, shall be placed on file with the administrator.

In the event an organization or mortgage loan originator employed by or under contract with an organization has violated any of the provisions of this act or a rule or order lawfully made pursuant to this act pertaining to a residential mortgage loan transaction, or federal law or regulation pertaining to the mortgage lending or mortgage brokering, and has damaged any person by such violation, then the bond shall be forfeited and paid by the surety to the state of Wyoming for the benefit of any person so damaged, in an amount sufficient to satisfy the violation or the bond in its entirety if the violation exceeds the amount of the bond.

Surety bonds shall remain effective continuously until released in writing by the administrator. If a bond has not been previously released by the administrator, the bond shall expire two (2) years after the date of the surrender, revocation or expiration of the license.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-14-638.
Mortgage call reports.

Each organization employing or contracting with a mortgage loan originator shall submit to the registry reports of condition, which shall be in such form and shall contain such information as required by the registry.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 40-14-639.
Report to the registry.

The administrator shall regularly report violations of this act relating to transactions conducted by mortgage loan originators, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the registry subject to the provisions contained in W.S.

40-14-636

. The administrator shall establish by rule a process where a mortgage loan originator may challenge information entered into the registry by the administrator.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.